Hawaii, session 2026, SB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 124, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015, authorized the department of education to award high school diplomas to qualified persons who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory induction into active service in the armed services of the United States or any person whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices such as internment during World War II until June 30, 2020. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the department of education to award high school diplomas to a qualified person who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory or voluntary induction into active service in the armed services of the United States or whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices during World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    High school diploma for armed services veterans and other qualified persons. (a)  The department is authorized to establish a program to award a high school diploma to any qualified person who: (1)  Did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory or voluntary induction into active service in the armed services of the United States during World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War; or (2)  Did not receive a high school diploma and whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices during World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War. (b)  A qualified person seeking a high school diploma shall submit information establishing eligibility for the award of a high school diploma pursuant to subsection (a) to the department on forms prescribed by the department. (c)  For purposes of this section, a "qualified person" means any individual who: (1)  Was a resident of the State or the Territory of Hawaii and was compulsorily or voluntarily inducted into the armed services of the United States or whose high school education was interrupted between: (A)  December 1, 1941, and August 30, 1945; (B)  June 1, 1950, and July 31, 1953; or (C)  August 1, 1964, and January 31, 1973; while enrolled in a high school in the State or the Territory of Hawaii; and (2)  Did not complete a high school curriculum and receive a high school diploma." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________